apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.ca.dix
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guda</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guts</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gut</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ixem</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ixeu</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ixes</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ixen</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ix</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guem</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gui</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gueu</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guis</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gues</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>guin</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>guen</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gui</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aparé/ixer__vblex">
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ixer</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ixer</l>
          <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="aparèixer"><p><l>aparé</l><r>aparè</r></p><par n="aparé/ixer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conèixer"><p><l>coné</l><r>conè</r></p><par n="aparé/ixer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reconèixer"><p><l>reconé</l><r>reconè</r></p><par n="aparé/ixer__vblex"/></e>
